Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 3. Licensee Obligations.

Sec. 06.60.100.
Annual report.

Annually, on or before a date established by the department by regulation, a mortgage licensee and a registered depository institution shall file a report with the department providing relevant information that the department requires concerning the business and operations of the mortgage licensee or registered depository institution. The mortgage licensee and the registered depository institution shall make the report under oath or on affirmation. The content and form of the report shall be established by the department by regulation.

A mortgage licensee who or registered depository institution that fails to file a report as required by this section is subject to a civil penalty of $25 for each day’s failure to file the report.

A mortgage licensee and a registered depository institution shall submit to the registry, as required by the registry, reports of the condition of the licensee or registered depository institution, which must be in the form and contain the information that the registry may require.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 28, 29 ch 61 SLA 2010; am § 8 ch 51 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For licensee obligations, see 3 AAC 14, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), (b) and (c), inserted “registered depository institution” in six places and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 06.60.105.
Biennial license fee. [Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

Sec. 06.60.110.
Location of business.

A mortgage licensee may not maintain the mortgage licensee’s principal place of business or a branch office within an office, suite, room, or place of business in which any other business is solicited or engaged in, or in association or conjunction with another business, unless the name, ownership, and business purpose of the other business is disclosed in the mortgage licensee’s application for a mortgage license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensee obligations, see 3 AAC 14, art. 5.

Sec. 06.60.112.
Branch office application.

A mortgage licensee shall submit an application to register a branch office to the department through the registry. The department may adopt by regulation procedures and fees for the submission of an application to register a branch office, consistent with the requirements of the registry. The department may adopt by regulation fees and other requirements for renewal of a branch office registration that are consistent with the requirements of the registry.

History.

(§ 30 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.115.
Change of place of business.

If a mortgage licensee wishes to change the mortgage licensee’s place of business to another location, the mortgage licensee shall submit a written notice to the department at least 10 days before relocating the business. If the mortgage licensee is otherwise in compliance with this chapter, the department shall issue a revised mortgage license to the mortgage licensee that reflects the new location.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensee obligations, see 3 AAC 14, art. 5.

Sec. 06.60.120.
Transfer of business.

A mortgage licensee may only transfer or assign the licensee’s business if

an application is made to the department to transfer or assign the business to another mortgage licensee with the same type of mortgage license as the transferring or assigning mortgage licensee;

at least 30 days before the effective date of the proposed transfer or assignment, the department determines it has received a complete application from the proposed assignee or transferee; and

the department determines that the proposed transferee or assignee complies with AS

06.60.060

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.130.
Change in business control or business operations.

The prior approval of the department that is made in a record is required for the continued operation of a mortgage licensee’s business when a change in control of the mortgage licensee is proposed. The department may require the information it considers necessary to determine whether a new application is required. The mortgage licensee requesting approval of the change in control shall pay all reasonable expenses incurred by the department to investigate and approve or deny the change in control. The department may establish by regulation the fees and other requirements for requesting approval of a change in control that are consistent with the requirements of the registry.

If there is a material change in the business operations of a mortgage licensee not covered by AS

06.60.120

, the mortgage licensee shall provide written notice to the department at least 30 days before the effective date of the change in business operations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 31 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.135.
Records of mortgage licensee.

The requirements of this section apply to the business transactions of a mortgage licensee or registered depository institution that occur entirely or partially in this state.

A mortgage licensee or registered depository institution shall keep and use in the business of the mortgage licensee or registered depository institution the accounting records that are in accord with generally accepted accounting principles.

A mortgage licensee and a registered depository institution shall maintain a record of the account of each borrower and for each mortgage loan or mortgage loan application that is related to the purchase or refinancing of an existing mortgage loan. This record must contain all documents, work papers, electronic correspondence, and forms that are produced or prepared for the mortgage loan by the mortgage licensee or registered depository institution, and the mortgage licensee and registered depository institution shall retain each document, work paper, electronic correspondence, and form for 36 months from the date they were created.

A mortgage licensee and a registered depository institution shall retain, for at least three years after final payment is made on a mortgage loan, or three years after a mortgage loan is sold, whichever occurs first, the original contract for the compensation of the mortgage licensee or registered depository institution, copies of the note, settlement statement, and truth-in-lending disclosure, an account of fees received in connection with the loan, and other papers or records relating to the loan that may be required by department order or regulation.

If a mortgage licensee or registered depository institution conducts business as a mortgage loan servicing agent for mortgage loans that the mortgage licensee or registered depository institution owns, or as an agent for other mortgage lenders or investors, the mortgage licensee or registered depository institution shall, in addition to complying with (b) and (c) of this section, maintain a record for each mortgage loan. The record of each mortgage loan must include the amount of the mortgage loan, the total amount of interest and finance charges on the mortgage loan, the interest rate on the mortgage loan, the amount of each payment to be made on the mortgage loan, a description of the collateral taken for the mortgage loan, a history of all payments received by the mortgage licensee or registered depository institution on the mortgage loan, a detailed history of the amount of each payment that is applied to the reduction of the mortgage loan principal, the interest that accrues on the mortgage loan, and any other fees and charges that are related to the mortgage loan, as well as other papers required by law, department order, or regulation. The mortgage licensee or registered depository institution shall retain the record required by this subsection for three years after the loan is sold to another mortgage loan servicing agent or after the mortgage loan is satisfied, whichever occurs first.

In this section, “mortgage loan servicing agent” means a person who acts on behalf of the owner of a mortgage loan to collect payments on the mortgage loan and enforce the terms of the mortgage loan.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 9 — 13 ch 51 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For licensee obligations, see 3 AAC 14, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), inserted “or registered depository institution” following “mortgage licensee”; in (b), inserted “or registered depository institution” following “mortgage licensee”; deleted “mortgage licensee’s” preceding “business”; inserted “of the mortgage licensee or registered depository institution” following “business”; in (c), inserted “and a registered depository institution” following “mortgage licensee” in three places; in (d), inserted “and a registered depository institution” following “mortgage licensee”; deleted “mortgage licensee’s” preceding “compensation”; inserted “of the mortgage licensee or registered depository institution” following “compensation”; in (e), inserted “or registered depository institution” following “mortgage licensee” in five places.

Sec. 06.60.140.
Availability of out-of-state records.

A mortgage licensee who or registered depository institution that operates an office or other place of business outside this state shall, at the request of the department,

make the records of the office or place of business available to the department at a location within this state; or

reimburse the department its reasonable costs, as provided in AS

06.60.250(k)

, that are incurred by the department in conjunction with an investigation or examination conducted at the office or place of business.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 32 ch 61 SLA 2010; am § 14 ch 51 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, inserted “or registered depository institution that” preceding “operates an office”.

Secs. 06.60.145,
06.60.150.
Disqualified persons; posting of license. [Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 06.60.155.
Restriction on mortgage loan originator licensee’s work.

A mortgage loan originator licensee may only work as a mortgage loan originator licensee under contract for, or as an employee of, one mortgage licensee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 33 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.157.
Restrictions on mortgage licensee’s performance of mortgage loan originator activities.

A mortgage licensee may not perform mortgage loan originator activities except through a licensed mortgage loan originator who is an employee of or under exclusive contract with a mortgage licensee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 34 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.159.
Mortgage licensee’s employment of, contract with, and liability for mortgage loan originator.

A mortgage licensee may not employ or enter into a contract with a person who acts as a mortgage loan originator for the mortgage licensee unless the person has a mortgage loan originator license.

A mortgage licensee is liable for the conduct of a person acting as a mortgage loan originator if the mortgage licensee knows or should have known that the person’s conduct violates this chapter and the person is employed by or is under contract with the mortgage licensee to act as a mortgage loan originator.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 35 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For licensee obligations, see 3 AAC 14, art. 5.

Sec. 06.60.160.
Continuing education requirements for mortgage loan originators.

Each calendar year, a licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight hours of education approved under (b) of this section. At a minimum, these hours must include

three hours of instruction in federal statutes and regulations;

two hours of instruction in ethics, including instruction on issues related to fraud prevention, consumer protection, and fair lending; and

two hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

For the purposes of (a) of this section, a continuing education course must be approved under 12 U.S.C. 5105(b)(2) (Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008). Review and approval of a continuing education course includes review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section precludes a continuing education course that is approved under (b) of this section and that is provided by the employer of the applicant, an entity affiliated with the applicant, or a subsidiary or affiliate of an employer or entity affiliated with the applicant.

Continuing education may be offered in a classroom, on-line, or by other means approved under 12 U.S.C. 5105(b)(2) (Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008).

A licensed mortgage loan originator

except as provided by (i) of this section, may only receive credit for a continuing education course in the calendar year in which the course is taken; and

may not retake an approved course in the same or successive calendar years if the mortgage loan originator has previously taken the course to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an approved instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator’s own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two hours of credit for each one hour taught.

Successful completion of a continuing education course approved for another state by the registry shall be accepted as credit toward completion of continuing education requirements in this state.

Before a new or renewed license may be issued to a licensed mortgage loan originator who has become unlicensed, the mortgage loan originator shall complete the continuing education requirements for the last calendar year in which the mortgage loan originator’s license was valid.

A person meeting the requirements of AS

06.60.087

, other than the continuing education requirement of AS

06.60.087(a)(2)

, may make up a deficiency in continuing education in a manner established by regulation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 36 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For originator competency testing and continuing education, see 3 AAC 14, art. 3.